Massachusetts, session 194th, H690.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 35BB of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 7 and 8, the figure “1” and inserting
in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 2.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 70B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in lines 29 and 30, the figure “1” and inserting in place thereof, in each
instance, the following figure:- 2.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 70B is hereby amended by inserting after section 5 the
following section:-
Section 5A. No eligible applicant that submits a statement of interest to the authority
pursuant to section 5 shall be denied an invite to apply for a school facilities grant solely because
of the age of the system in need of repair. The authority may consider the age of the system in
need of repair as a factor when reviewing applications for the purpose of designating approved
of 2

school projects pursuant to section 6, and for the purpose of prioritizing the approval of school
projects and reimbursements pursuant to section 8; provided, however, that no application shall
be rejected based solely on the age of the system in need of repair; and provided, further, that the
authority may prioritize the repair of older systems.
of 2